Utah statutes.
41-6a-1403.   Motor vehicle left unattended -- Requirements.

(1)  A person operating or in charge of a motor vehicle may not permit the vehicle to stand unattended without:

(a)  stopping the engine;

(b)  locking the ignition and removing the key;

(c)  placing the transmission in "park" or the gears in "low" or "reverse" if the vehicle has a manual shift; or

(d)  effectively setting the brakes thereon.

(2)  A person shall turn  the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway when standing a vehicle on any perceptible grade.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

